Washington statutes.
RCW 13.04.135

Establishment of house or room of detention.

Counties containing more than fifty thousand inhabitants shall, and counties containing a lesser number of inhabitants may, provide and maintain at public expense, a detention room or house of detention, separated or removed from any jail, or police station, to be in charge of a matron, or other person of good character, wherein all children within the provisions of this chapter shall, when necessary, be sheltered.

[ 1983 c 98 s 2; 1945 c 121 s 1; 1913 c 160 s 13; Rem. Supp. 1945 1987-13. Formerly RCW 13.16.010.]

NOTES:

Detention in facility under jurisdiction of juvenile court—Financial responsibility for cost of detention: RCW 13.34.161.